California statutes. Business and Professions Code
The director may assess administrative fines of fifty dollars ($50) against any licensee, registrant, or firearms qualification cardholder for each violation for failure to notify the bureau within 30 days of any change of residence or business address. The principal place of business may be at a home or at a business address, but it shall be the place at which the licensee maintains a permanent office.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 800, Sec. 43.   (SB 1196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

7587.15.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the director may assess a fine of up to five thousand dollars ($5,000) per violation against any licensee for a failure to comply with subdivision (d) of Section 7583.2.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 377, Sec. 33.   (SB 609)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

7587.16.

(a) The director, through his or her designee, may assess an administrative fine pursuant to Section 28022 of the Penal Code.

(b) An assessment imposed pursuant to that section may be appealed pursuant to Section 7581.3.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 423, Sec. 5.   (AB 2220)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Revenue [7588. - 7588.6.]

7588.

The fees prescribed by this chapter are as follows:

(a) The application and examination fee for an original license for a private patrol operator shall be at least five hundred fifty dollars ($550) and may be increased to an amount not to exceed six hundred five dollars ($605).

(b) The application fee for an original branch office certificate for a private patrol operator shall be at least two hundred fifty dollars ($250) and may be increased to an amount not to exceed two hundred seventy-five dollars ($275).

(c) The fee for an original license for a private patrol operator shall be at least seven hundred seventy dollars ($770) and may be increased to an amount
 not to exceed eight hundred forty-seven dollars ($847).

(d) The initial application and examination fee for an original certificate for a qualified manager shall be at least three hundred fifty dollars ($350) and may be increased to an amount not to exceed three hundred eighty-five dollars ($385). 

(e) The renewal fee is as follows:

(1) For a license as a private patrol operator, the fee shall be at least nine hundred dollars ($900) and may be increased to an amount not to exceed nine hundred ninety dollars ($990).

(2) For a branch office certificate for a private patrol operator, the fee shall be at least one hundred fifty dollars ($150) and may be increased to an amount not to exceed one hundred sixty-five dollars ($165).

(f) The delinquency fee for a license, registration, or certificate is 50 percent of the renewal fee in effect on the date of expiration, but not less than twenty-five dollars ($25).

(g) A reinstatement fee is equal to the amount of the renewal fee plus the regular delinquency fee.

(h) The fee for reexamination of an applicant or the applicant’s manager shall be at least sixty dollars ($60) and may be increased to an amount not to exceed sixty-six dollars ($66).

(i) Registration fees pursuant to this chapter are as follows:

(1) A registration fee for a security guard shall be at least fifty-five dollars ($55) and may be increased to an amount not to exceed sixty dollars ($60).

(2) A security guard registration renewal fee shall be at least forty dollars ($40) and may be increased to an amount not to exceed forty-four dollars ($44).

(j) Fees to carry out other provisions of this chapter are as follows:

(1) (A) A firearms permit fee shall be at least one hundred dollars ($100) and may be increased to an amount not to exceed one hundred ten dollars ($110).

(B) A firearms permit renewal fee shall be at least eighty dollars ($80) and may be increased to an amount not to exceed eighty-eight dollars ($88).

(2) (A) An initial baton permit fee shall be sixty dollars ($60) and may be increased to an amount not to exceed sixty-six
 dollars ($66).

(B) A baton permit renewal fee shall be forty dollars ($40) and may be increased to an amount not to exceed forty-four dollars ($44).

(3) (A) An application fee for certification as a firearms training facility shall be at least eight hundred dollars ($800) and may be increased to an amount not to exceed eight hundred eighty dollars ($880).

(B) A renewal fee for certification as a firearms training facility shall be at least seven hundred fifty dollars ($750) and may be increased to an amount not to exceed eight hundred twenty-five dollars ($825).

(4) (A) An application fee for certification as a baton training facility shall be at least seven hundred dollars ($700) and may be increased to an
 amount not to exceed seven hundred seventy dollars ($770).

(B) A renewal fee for certification as a baton training facility shall be at least five hundred fifty dollars ($550) and may be increased to an amount not to exceed six hundred five dollars ($605).

(5) (A) An application fee for certification as a firearms or baton training instructor shall be at least three hundred fifty dollars ($350) and may be increased to an amount not to exceed three hundred eighty-five dollars ($385).

(B) A renewal fee for certification as a firearms training instructor shall be at least three hundred dollars ($300) and may be increased to an amount not to exceed three hundred thirty dollars ($330).

(C) A renewal fee for certification as a baton
 training instructor shall be at least two hundred seventy-five dollars ($275) and may be increased to an amount not to exceed three hundred three dollars ($303).

(6) The fee for the replacement of a lost or destroyed registration card, license, certificate, or permit authorized by this chapter shall be twenty-five dollars ($25). The request for a replacement of a registration card, license, certificate, or permit shall be made in the manner prescribed by the bureau.

(7) The fee for a Certificate of Licensure, as specified in Section 7582.11, shall be twenty-five dollars ($25).

(k) The fee for an endorsed verification of registration, licensure, certification, or permit shall be twenty-five dollars ($25). The verification document shall include the registration, license, certificate, or permit number, the
 registration, license, certificate, or permit history and current status, the date of the endorsement, an embossed seal, and the signature of the chief.

(l) The reinstatement fee following a suspension pursuant to Section 7587.11 shall be 25 percent of the renewal fee.

(m) A renewal fee for a qualified manager certificate shall be at least two hundred twenty-five dollars ($225) and may be increased to an amount not to exceed two hundred forty-eight dollars ($248).

(n) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2025.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 36) and added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 571, Sec. 2.   (AB 1244)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Operative January 1, 2025, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

7588.1.

The fee for processing fingerprints for all registrations and licenses is that amount charged the bureau by the Department of Justice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1285, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

7588.2.

The Department of Consumer Affairs shall receive and account for all money derived from the operation of this chapter and, at the end of each month, shall report such money to the Controller and shall pay it to the Treasurer, who shall keep the money in a separate fund known as the Private Security Services Fund. All money in the Private Security Services Fund shall be expended in accordance with law by the bureau for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this chapter when appropriated by the Legislature. Effective July 1, 1995, the department shall propose a separate budget and expenditure statement and a separate revenue statement outlining all money derived from and expended for the licensing and regulation of private security services in accordance with this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1285, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

7588.3.

All money derived from the licensing and regulation of persons licensed under this chapter shall be expended exclusively on the licensing and regulation of these persons. If, at the end of any fiscal year, the money derived from this licensing and not expended pursuant to this section is an amount which equals or is more than the money necessary for the regulation of licensees for the next two fiscal years, license or other fees shall be reduced during the following fiscal year in an amount which will reduce any surplus money derived from the licensing to an amount less than the money expended for the regulation of licensees for the next two fiscal years.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1285, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

7588.4.

Application or license fees shall not be refunded except in accordance with Section 158.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1285, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

7588.5.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Director of Consumer Affairs is authorized to temporarily reduce fees required by either paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (h) of Section 7588, or both, upon receipt of federal funds by the Department of Consumer Affairs for implementation of this act or any enhancement of private security services in this state, provided that the funds received are sufficient to justify the reduction.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 886, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

7588.6.

(a) A peace officer of this state or a political subdivision thereof who engages in off-duty employment solely and exclusively as a security guard or security officer, and who is required to be registered as a security guard or security officer pursuant to this chapter, shall only be subject to the following:

(1) The fees required by subdivision (h) of Section 7588.

(2) The fees required by paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (i) of Section 7588 if the peace officer carries or uses a firearm or baton as part of the off-duty employment and has not received approval of their primary employer, as defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (i) of Section 7583.9, to carry a firearm or baton while working as
 a security guard or security officer, and has not submitted verification of that approval to the bureau pursuant to subdivision (i) of Section 7583.9.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2024.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 42) and added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 287, Sec. 43.   (AB 2515)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative January 1, 2024, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Review [7588.8. - 7588.8.]

7588.8.

Notwithstanding any other law, the powers and duties of the bureau, as set forth in this chapter, shall be subject to review by the appropriate policy committees of the Legislature. The review shall be performed as if this chapter were scheduled to be repealed as of January 1, 2029.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 484, Sec. 42.   (SB 1454)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 11.6. Alarm Companies [7590. - 7599.80.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [7590. - 7590.6.]

7590.

This chapter constitutes the chapter on alarm company operators and alarm agents. It may be cited as the Alarm Company Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1210, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

7590.1.

The following terms as used in this chapter have the meaning expressed in this article:

(a) (1) “Advertisement” means:

(A) Any written or printed communication for the purpose of soliciting, describing, or promoting the licensed business of the licensee, including a brochure, letter, pamphlet, newspaper, periodical, publication, or other writing.

(B) A directory listing caused or permitted by the licensee which indicates their licensed activity.

(C) A radio, television, or similar airwave transmission
 that
 solicits or promotes the licensed business of the licensee.

(2) “Advertisement” does not include any of the following:

(A) Any printing or writing used on buildings, vehicles, uniforms, badges, or other property where the purpose of the printing or writing is identification.

(B) Any printing or writing on communications, memoranda, or any other writings used in the ordinary course of business where the sole purpose of the writing is other than the solicitation or promotion of business.

(C) Any printing or writing on novelty objects used in the promotion of the licensee’s business where the printing of the information required by this chapter would
 be impractical due to the available area or surface.

(b) “Alarm agent” means a person employed by an alarm company operator whose duties, being physically conducted within the state, include selling on premises, altering, installing, maintaining, moving, repairing, replacing, servicing, responding, or monitoring an alarm system, and those ancillary devices connected to and controlled by the alarm system, including supplementary smoke detectors, or a person who manages or supervises a person employed by an alarm company to perform any of the duties described in this subdivision or any person in training for any of the duties described in this subdivision.

(c) (1) “Alarm system” means an assembly of equipment and devices arranged to detect a hazard or
 signal the presence of an off-normal situation.

(2) “Alarm system” does not include a fire protection system, as defined in the California Fire Code.

(d) “Branch office” means any location, other than the principal place of business of the licensee, which is licensed as set forth in Article 11 (commencing with Section 7599.20).

(e) “Branch office manager” means an individual designated by the qualified manager to manage the licensee’s branch office and who has met the requirements as set forth in Article 11 (commencing with Section 7599.20).

(f) “Bureau” means the Bureau of Security and Investigative Services.

(g) “Chief” means the Chief of the Bureau of Security and Investigative Services.

(h) “Deadly weapon” means and includes any instrument or weapon of the kind commonly known as a blackjack, slungshot, billy, sandclub, sandbag, or metal knuckles; any dirk, dagger, pistol, revolver, or any other firearm; any knife having a blade longer than five inches; any razor with an unguarded blade; or any metal pipe or bar used or intended to be used as a club.

(i) “Department” means the Department of Consumer Affairs.

(j) “Director” means the
 Director of Consumer Affairs.

(k) “Employee” means an individual who works for an employer, is listed on the employer’s payroll records, and is under the employer’s direction and control.

(l) “Employer” means a person who employs an individual for wages or salary, lists the individual on the employer’s payroll records, and withholds all legally required deductions and contributions.

(m) “Employer-employee relationship” means an individual who works for another and where the individual’s name appears on the payroll records of the employer.

(n) “Firearm permit” means and includes “firearms permit,” “firearms qualification card,” “firearms qualification,”
 and “firearms qualification permit.”

(o) “Firearms permit” means a permit issued by the bureau, pursuant to Article 6 (commencing with Section 7596), to a licensee, a qualified manager, or an alarm agent, to carry an exposed firearm while on duty.

(p) “Licensee” means a business entity, whether an individual, partnership, limited liability company, or corporation licensed under this chapter.

(q) “Manager” means an individual designated under an operating agreement of a manager-managed limited liability company who is responsible for performing the management functions for the limited liability company specified in subdivision (c) of Section 17704.07 of the Corporations Code.

(r) “Member” means an individual who is a member of a limited liability company as defined in subdivision (p) of Section 17701.02 of the Corporations Code.

(s) “Person” means any individual, firm, company, association, organization, partnership, limited liability company, or corporation.

(t) “Qualified manager” means an individual who is in active control, management, and direction of the licensee’s business, and who is in possession of a current and valid qualified manager’s certificate pursuant to this chapter.

(u) “Registrant” means any person registered or who has applied for registration under this chapter.

(v) “Residential sales agreement”
 means and includes an agreement between an alarm company operator and an owner or tenant for the purchase of an alarm system to be utilized in the personal residence of the owner or tenant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 376, Sec. 19.   (AB 830)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

7590.2.

(a) An “alarm company operator” means a person who, for any consideration whatsoever, engages in business or accepts employment to install, maintain, alter, sell on premises, monitor, or service alarm systems, and those ancillary devices connected to and controlled by the alarm system, including supplementary smoke detectors, or who responds to alarm systems except for any alarm agent. “Alarm company operator,” includes any entity that is retained by a licensed alarm company operator, a customer, or any other person or entity, to monitor one or more alarm systems, whether or not the entity performs any other duties within the definition of an alarm company operator. The provisions of this chapter, to the extent that they can be made
 applicable, shall be applicable to the duties and functions performed in monitoring alarm systems.

(b) A person licensed as an alarm company operator shall not conduct any investigation or investigations except those that are incidental to personal injury, or the theft, loss, embezzlement, misappropriation, or concealment of any property, or any other thing enumerated in this section, which they have been hired or engaged to protect.

(c) A person who is licensed, certified, or registered pursuant to this chapter is exempt from locksmithing requirements, pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 6980.12, if the duties performed that constitute locksmithing are performed in combination with the installation, maintenance, moving, repairing, replacing, servicing, or reconfiguration
 of an alarm system, as defined in Section 7590.1, and limited to work on electronic locks or access control devices that are controlled by an alarm system control device, including the removal of existing hardware.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 376, Sec. 20.   (AB 830)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

7590.3.

This chapter does not apply to:

(a) A person employed exclusively and regularly by any employer who does not provide contract alarm services for other entities or persons, in connection with the affairs of that employer only and where there exists an employer-employee relationship. A person so employed shall at no time carry or use any deadly weapon in the performance of his or her duties.

(b) An officer or employee of the United States of America, or of this state or a political subdivision thereof, while the officer or employee is engaged in the performance of his or her official duties, including uniformed peace officers employed part time by a public agency pursuant to a written agreement between a chief of police or sheriff and the public agency.

(c) Patrol special police officers appointed by the police commission of any city, county, or city and county under the express terms of its charter.

(d) A licensed private patrol operator or any employee of a licensed private patrol operator who is employed as a security guard, security officer, or street patrol person as defined in Section 7582.1 and who is employed to respond to alarm systems.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 376, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

7590.5.

Notwithstanding any other requirements for licensure as an alarm company operator or for registration as an alarm agent pursuant to this chapter, an applicant for an alarm company operator license or an alarm agent registration shall be at least 18 years of age.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 377, Sec. 36.   (SB 609)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

7590.6.

(a) Notwithstanding any law, any application for a license, registration, certification, or permit required by this chapter shall be submitted electronically through the online licensing and enforcement platform, including, but not limited to, applications for an original, renewal, reinstatement, or replacement license, registration, certificate, or permit.

(b) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2022.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 376, Sec. 21.   (AB 830)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative July 1, 2022, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Administration [7591. - 7591.20.]

7591.

There is in the Department of Consumer Affairs a Bureau of Security and Investigative Services. The bureau is under the supervision and control of the director. The director shall administer and enforce the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1263, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

7591.1.

The Governor shall appoint a chief of the bureau at a salary to be fixed in accordance with Section 12080.3 of the Government Code. The chief shall serve under the direction and supervision of the director.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1210, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

7591.2.

Every power and duty granted to or imposed upon the director under this chapter may be delegated to the chief, except that the director may not delegate authority to adopt or otherwise act upon any proposed decision of a hearing officer after a hearing under the provisions of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. The chief may delegate any power or duty granted to or imposed upon him or her under this chapter to the deputy chief, to the assistant chief, or to any inspection, investigation, or auditing personnel of the bureau.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1210, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

7591.3.

The director, in accordance with the State Civil Service Act, and Section 159.5, may appoint and fix the compensation of such clerical, inspection, investigation, and auditing personnel, as well as an assistant chief, as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter. Except as otherwise provided in Section 159.5, all personnel shall perform their respective duties under the supervision and direction of the chief.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1210, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

7591.4.

The chief shall gather evidence of violations of this chapter and of any rule or regulation established under this chapter by unlicensed persons who engage in a business for which a license is required under this chapter and shall furnish the same to prosecuting officers of any county or city or city and county for the purpose of prosecuting those violations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1210, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

7591.5.

It shall be the duty of the chief to initiate and conduct investigations into the business operations of alarm company operators on his or her own motion, if the alarm company operator is not operating in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, or there has been a written complaint to the bureau about the actions and conduct of the alarm company operator or his or her employees or agents.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1210, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

7591.6.

The director, taking into consideration the recommendations of the advisory board, may establish and enforce such rules and regulations as may be reasonable and necessary for the examination and licensing of applicants, for the conduct of licensees, and for the general enforcement of the various provisions of this chapter in the protection of the public.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1210, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

7591.7.

The chief or his or her designee may inspect, examine, or investigate the relevant records, books, accounts, and files created and maintained by the alarm company operator. The chief shall have access to those relevant business records, not including client information relating to the operational integrity of the alarm system, necessary to the examination for the purpose of performing a random audit to determine compliance with the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1210, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

7591.8.

The director may automatically suspend a license, registration, or firearm qualification card if it is determined that the continued possession of such a license, registration, or card by the licensee, registrant, or card holder presents an undue hazard to public safety which may result in substantial injury to another.

A licensee, registrant, or firearm qualification card holder may request a review by the Alarm Company Operator Disciplinary Review Committee as set forth in Section 7591.19 to appeal the suspension.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1299, Sec. 23.)
-------------------------------------------

7591.9.

If, upon investigation, the chief determines that an alarm company operator, a qualified manager, or an alarm agent is in violation of Sections 7597.1, 7597.2, 7597.3, 7597.5, 7597.6, 7598.51, 7598.53, 7599.32, 7599.33, 7599.34, 7599.36, 7599.37, 7599.38, 7599.39, 7599.40, 7599.41, 7599.42, 7599.43, 7599.44, 7599.45, 7599.46, 7599.47, 7599.48, 7599.49, 7599.50, 7599.51, 7599.52, 7599.53, 7599.54, 7599.55, 7599.58, and 7599.59, the director may issue a citation to, and fine, the alarm company operator, qualified manager, or alarm agent. The citation and fine assessment shall be in writing and shall describe with particularity the nature of the violation, including specific reference to the provision of law determined to have been violated. The citation shall contain an order of abatement fixing a reasonable
 time for abatement of the violation and may contain assessment of an administrative fine. The amount of the fine for any single investigation or audit of an alarm company operator, a qualified manager, or an alarm agent shall not exceed two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500).

A citation and fine assessment shall inform the alarm company operator, qualified manager, or alarm agent that if they desire a review by the Alarm Company Operator Disciplinary Review Committee, the review shall be requested by written notice to the chief within 30 days of the issuance of the citation and assessment, as appropriate. If a review is not requested pursuant to this section, payment of any fine shall not constitute an admission of the violation charged. A review shall be held pursuant to the provisions of Section 7591.19.

If the alarm company operator, qualified manager, or alarm agent fails to request a review or fails to pay the
 assessed fine within 30 days of the assessment, the license, certificate, or registration shall not be renewed pursuant to the provisions of this chapter until the assessed fine is paid.

Administrative fines collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the Private Security Services Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 377, Sec. 37.   (SB 609)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

7591.10.

(a) The director may deny a license, certificate, or registration regulated by this chapter on the grounds that the applicant has done any of the following:

(1) Knowingly made a false statement of fact required to be revealed in the application for a license.

(2) Been convicted of a crime. A conviction within the meaning of this section means a plea or verdict of guilty or a conviction following a plea of nolo contendere. Any action which the bureau is permitted to take following the establishment of a conviction may be taken when the time for appeal has elapsed, or the judgment of conviction has been affirmed on appeal, or when an order granting probation is made suspending the imposition of
 sentence, irrespective of a subsequent order under the provisions of Section 1203.4 of the Penal Code.

(3) Done any act involving dishonesty, fraud, or deceit with the intent to substantially benefit himself, herself, or another, or to substantially injure another.

(4) Done any act which if done by a licensee would be grounds for suspension or revocation of a license.

(5) Done any act without a license for which a license is required under this chapter.

(6) Been refused a license under this chapter or had a license revoked.

(7) Been an officer, partner, member,
 manager, or qualified manager of any person who has been refused a license under this chapter or whose license has been suspended or revoked.

The bureau may deny a license, certificate, or registration pursuant to this section only if the crime or act is substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of the license, certificate, or registration for which application has been made.

The denial of a license, certificate, or registration shall be in writing and shall describe the basis for the denial. The denial shall inform the applicant that if he or she desires a review by the disciplinary review committee the review shall be requested within 30 days of the issuance of the denial. A review shall be held pursuant to the provisions of Section 7591.19.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, no person shall be denied a license, certificate, or registration solely on the basis that he or she has been convicted of a felony, if he or she has obtained a certificate of rehabilitation pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 4852.01) of Title 6 of Part 3 of the Penal Code, or solely on the basis that he or she has been convicted of a misdemeanor, if he or she has met all applicable requirements of the criteria of rehabilitation as provided in Section 7591.12.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 140, Sec. 3) by Stats. 2018, Ch. 406, Sec. 8.   (SB 904)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

7591.11.

(a) The bureau shall deny a firearms permit, pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 29800) of Division 9 of Title 4 of Part 6 of the Penal Code, to any licensee, qualified manager, or alarm agent who has been convicted of a felony, unless the felony conviction has been reduced pursuant to Section 17 of the Penal Code or the person has been pardoned by the Governor. The licensee, qualified manager, or alarm agent shall not have a right to a review or a hearing if the denial is made pursuant to this section.

(b) The bureau shall not issue a firearms permit pursuant to this chapter to an applicant who, within the past 12 months, has been found incapable of exercising appropriate judgment, restraint, and self-control,
 for the purposes of carrying and using a firearm during the course of his or her duties pursuant to the assessment required under Section 7583.47 for a permit associated with a security guard registration.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 800, Sec. 47.   (SB 1196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

7591.12.

(a) When considering the denial, suspension, or revocation of a license, certificate, or registration, for which application has been made under this chapter, the chief, in evaluating the rehabilitation of the applicant and his or her present eligibility for a license, certificate, or registration shall consider all the following criteria:

(1) The nature and severity of the act or crime under consideration as grounds for denial.

(2) Total criminal record.

(3) Evidence of any act committed subsequent to the act or crime under consideration as grounds for a denial, suspension, or revocation which also could be considered as grounds for denial under Section 7591.10.

(4) The time that has elapsed since commission of the act or crime referred to in paragraph (1) or (2).

(5) The extent to which the applicant has complied with any terms of parole, probation, restitution, or any other sanctions lawfully imposed against the applicant.

(6) Evidence, if any, of rehabilitation submitted by the applicant.

(b) When considering a petition for reinstatement of a license, certificate, or registration, the chief shall evaluate evidence of rehabilitation, considering those criteria of rehabilitation listed in subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1210, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

7591.13.

(a) The chief or his or her designee may issue a citation, in accordance with Section 148, against a person who is not otherwise exempt under this chapter and is acting or offering to act in the capacity of a licensee, registrant, permitholder, or certificate holder under this chapter without a valid license, registration, permit, or certificate, as applicable, under this chapter. 

(b) The chief or his or her designee may issue a citation against a person who places, or causes to be placed, an advertisement in any written, printed, or verbal communication for the purposes of soliciting business as an alarm company operator without a license under or an exemption from this chapter.

(c) A citation issued under this section may contain an assessment of an administrative fine up to five thousand dollars ($5,000) or, where appropriate, an order of abatement fixing a reasonable period of time not to exceed 30 days for abatement, or both that fine and order of abatement.

(d) A citation issued under this section shall meet the following requirements: 

(1) Be in writing and describe with particularity the nature of the violation, including specific reference to the provision of this chapter or the regulation adopted thereunder determined to have been violated.

(2) Inform the cited person that if he or she desires a hearing to contest the finding of a violation, that hearing shall be requested by written notice to the bureau within 30 days of the issuance of the citation.

(3) Inform the cited person that if he or she desires an informal conference with the chief or his or her designee to contest the finding of a violation, that informal conference shall be requested by written notice to the bureau within 10 days of the issuance of the citation.

(4) Be served upon the cited person in person or by certified mail.

(e) The chief or his or her designee shall consider the following factors when determining the amount of an administrative fine under this section:

(1) The good or bad faith exhibited by the cited person.

(2) The nature and severity of the violation.

(3) Evidence that the violation was
 willful.

(4) History of violations of the same or similar nature.

(5) The extent to which the cited person has cooperated with the bureau.

(6) The extent to which the cited person has mitigated or attempted to mitigate any damage or injury caused by his or her violation.

(7) Any other factors as justice may require.

(f) The time allowed for abatement of a citation issued under this section shall begin the first day after the order of abatement has been served. If a cited person who has been issued an order of abatement is unable to complete the correction within the timeframe set forth in the citation because of conditions beyond his or her control after the exercise of reasonable
 diligence, the person cited may request any extension of time in which to complete the correction from the chief or his or her designee. The request for an extension shall be in writing and shall be made within the timeframe set forth for abatement.

(g) If a person cited pursuant to this section desires a hearing to contest the citation, the cited person shall, within 30 days after service of the citation, file in writing a request for an administrative hearing to the chief or his or her designee regarding the acts charged in the citation, in accordance with paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 125.9.

(h) (1) In addition to, or instead of, requesting an administrative hearing, as provided for in subdivision (d), a person cited pursuant to this section may, within 10 days after service of the citation, contest the citation by submitting a written
 request for an informal citation conference to the chief or his or her designee.

(2) Upon receipt of a written request for an informal citation conference pursuant to paragraph (1), the chief or his or her designee shall, within 30 days, hold an informal citation conference with the cited person. If an informal citation conference is held, the chief or his or her designee may affirm, modify, or dismiss the citation, including any fine levied or order of abatement issued, at the conclusion of the informal citation conference. If affirmed or modified, the citation originally issued shall be considered withdrawn and an affirmed or modified citation shall be mailed to the cited person and his or her legal counsel, if any, within 15 days of the date of the informal citation conference.

(3) If a cited person wishes to contest a citation that is affirmed or modified pursuant to paragraph
 (2), the person shall, within 30 days of receiving the affirmed or modified citation, file in writing a request for an administrative hearing to the chief or his or her designee regarding the acts charged in the affirmed or modified citation, in accordance with paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 125.9.

(4) A cited person shall not request a subsequent informal conference with respect to a citation that is modified or affirmed during an informal conference under this subdivision.

(i) When an order of abatement is not contested or if the order is appealed and the person or entity cited does not prevail, failure to abate the violation charged within the timeframe specified in the citation or within 30 days after the appeal, whichever is later, shall constitute a violation and failure to comply with the order of abatement.

(j) This section shall not apply to a violation of this chapter that is subject to Section 7591.9.

(k) The sanctions authorized under this section shall be separate from, and in addition to, all other remedies either civil or criminal.

(l) Administrative fines collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the Private Security Services Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 291, Sec. 6.   (SB 1077)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

7591.14.

It is the intent of the Legislature, consistent with Section 128.5 of the Business and Professions Code, that the bureau shall not maintain a reserve balance of funds greater than the amount necessary to fund operating expenses of the bureau and that the bureau shall periodically review fees pursuant to this chapter to evaluate the appropriateness of each fee and the regulatory costs associated with each fee.
